Virginia statutes. Title 45.2. Mines, Minerals, and Energy.
Article 3. Personal Protection.

§ 45.2-906.
Personal protection devices and practices.

Every person at a surface coal mine shall wear the following protection in the specified conditions:

A hard hat in and around any area of a mine where falling objects could cause injury.

Hard-toed footwear in and around a mine.

Safety goggles or a shield where there is a hazard of flying material.

A protective shield or goggles when welding.

Snug-fitting clothes when working around moving parts or machinery.

Gloves where the hands could be injured. Gauntlet cuffed gloves are prohibited around moving machinery.

The operator shall supply ear protection to any miner upon request.

Every person assigned to or performing duties at a surface mine work area shall wear reflective material adequate to make the person visible from all sides Such reflective material shall be placed on the hard hat and at least one other item of outer clothing, such as a belt, suspenders, a jacket, a coat, coveralls, a shirt, pants, or a vest.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 45-72, 45-86; 1954, c. 191; 1966, c. 594, §§ 45.1-26, 45.1-99; 1978, cc. 489, 729; 1994, c. 28, § 45.1-161.259; 2011, cc. 826, 862; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-907.
Housekeeping.

Good housekeeping shall be practiced in and around every building, shaft, slope, yard, or other area of the mine. Such practices include cleanliness, orderly storage of materials, and the removal of possible sources of injury, such as stumbling hazards, protruding nails, broken glass, and material that could fall or roll.

Every surface mine structure, enclosure, or other facility shall be maintained in a safe condition.

History.

Code 1950, § 45-85.8; 1954, c. 191; 1966, c. 594, § 45.1-37; 1978, c. 729; 1994, c. 28, § 45.1-161.260; 2005, c. 3; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, c. 3, cl. 4 provides: “That an emergency exists and this act is in force from its passage [February 10, 2005].”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 13 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2021.”

§ 45.2-908.
Noxious fumes.

Painting or any operation that creates noxious fumes shall be performed only in a well-ventilated atmosphere.

History.

Code 1950, § 45-85.5; 1954, c. 191; 1966, c. 594, § 45.1-34; 1978, c. 729; 1994, c. 28, § 45.1-161.261; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.